West Virginia, session 2025, HB2284.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Department of Agriculture. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 25, 2024, authorized under the authority of §19-2B-3 of this code, relating to the Department of Agriculture (inspection of meat and poultry, 61 CSR 16), is authorized.